Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-328
Occupation tax; refund; procedure;
appeal.

Any corporation paying the occupation
tax imposed by section 21-303 or 21-306 may claim a refund if
the payment of such occupation tax was invalid
for any reason. The corporation shall file a written claim and any evidence
supporting the claim within two years after payment of such occupation
tax. The Secretary of State shall either approve or deny the claim
within thirty days after such filing. Any approved claims shall be paid out
of the General Fund. Appeal of a decision by the Secretary of State shall
be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1984, LB 799, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 21;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 259.
January 1, 2017
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.